Illinois, session 104th, SB2843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 5Sections 9, 10, 11, 16, 19, 21, and 24 and by adding Section 68.2 as follows: 7    (705 ILCS 505/8.2 new)8    Sec. 8.2. Uncontested contractual claims.9    (a) A State agency must confirm or reject an uncontested 10claim arising under subsection (b) of Section 8 of this Act 11that is from a lapsed appropriation and valued at less than 12$2,500 within 30 days after being notified in writing of the 13claim by the Attorney General. If the State agency does not 14confirm or reject the claim within that 30-day period, then 15the State agency forfeits the right to reject or contest the 16claim. Subject to appropriation, the Comptroller must then 17issue payment to the vendor within 30 days of the court 18entering an award for a claim described in this Section.19    (b) If the court determines that it is unable to process an 20uncontested claim under this Section because the bill or 21invoice contains a defect, the court must notify the vendor in 22writing of the defect no later than 30 days after the bill or 23invoice was first submitted. The notice must identify the   SB2843- 2 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1defect and any additional information necessary to correct the 2defect. If one or more items on a bill or invoice are 3disapproved, but not the entire bill or invoice, then the 4portion that is not disapproved must be transmitted to the 5Comptroller for payment. For disapproved portions of a claim, 6the court must allow vendors to submit documentation to amend 7and cure defects.8    (c) The Court of Claims may adopt rules to implement this 9Act. 10    (705 ILCS 505/9)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.9)11    Sec. 9. Powers and duties. The court may:12    (a) The court shall confirm receipt of a claim to the 13vendor within 30 days for all claims arising under subsection 14(b) of Section 8 of this Act. 15    (b) The court may establish A. Establish rules for its 16government and for the regulation of practice therein; appoint 17commissioners to assist the court in such manner as it directs 18and discharge them at will; and exercise such powers as are 19necessary to carry into effect the powers granted in this 20Section. Any Commissioner appointed shall be an attorney 21licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois. The rules 22established hereunder shall not be waived, and any extension 23of time authorized by such rules shall only be allowed on 24motion duly filed within the time limitation for which the 25extension is requested.  SB2843- 3 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1    (c) The court may issue B. Issue subpoenas through the 2Chief Justice or one of its judges or commissioners to require 3the attendance of witnesses for the purpose of testifying 4before it, or before any judge of the court, or before any 5notary public, or any of its commissioners, and to require the 6production of any books, records, papers or documents that may 7be material or relevant as evidence in any matter pending 8before it. In case any person refuses to comply with any 9subpoena issued in the name of the chief justice, or one of the 10judges or commissioners, attested by the clerk, with the seal 11of the court attached, and served upon the person named 12therein as a summons in a civil action is served, the circuit 13court of the proper county, on application of the party at 14whose instance the subpoena was issued, shall compel obedience 15by attachment proceedings, as for contempt, as in a case of a 16disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena from such court 17on a refusal to testify therein.18    C. The court may adopt administrative rules to provide for 19remote or electronic filing of a claim or other motion, 20participation in any capacity before the court, taking of 21evidence or testimony, conducting any business of the court, 22or payment of any fees to the court. 23(Source: P.A. 104-188, eff. 1-1-26.) 24    (705 ILCS 505/10)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.10)25    Sec. 10. Oaths; administrative determination of claims;   SB2843- 4 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1rules. 2    (a) The judges, commissioners and the clerk of the court 3may administer oaths and affirmations, take acknowledgments of 4instruments in writing, and give certificates of them.5    (b) The clerk of the court may administratively determine 6claims against the State if the claim includes all of the 7following:8        (1) the claim arises under subsection (b) of Section 8 9    of this Act;10        (2) the claim does not arise under an appropriation 11    for the current fiscal year;12        (3) the relevant State agency concurs in the claim;13        (4) the amount claimed is less than $2,500; and14        (5) the Attorney General recommends that the court 15    approve the claim.16    The relevant State agency shall prepare the record of the 17claim consisting of all documents required to be filed or 18submitted to the court and file them with the clerk. The clerk 19shall consider the claim informally upon the record submitted. 20If the clerk determines that the claim meets the requirements 21of this Act, the clerk shall file a statement with the court to 22that effect. If the clerk finds that the record is inadequate 23or does not comply with the requirements of this Act, the clerk 24shall reject the claim. The rejection of a claim under this 25Section does not bar its resubmission under the court's 26regular procedure.   SB2843- 5 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 2    (705 ILCS 505/11)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.11)3    Sec. 11. Filing claims.4    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 5Section and subsection (4) of Section 24, the claimant shall 6in all cases set forth fully in his petition the claim, the 7action thereon, if any, on behalf of the State, what persons 8are owners or trustees as defined in Section 3 of the 9Charitable Trust Act thereof or interested therein, when and 10upon what consideration such persons became so interested; 11that no assignment or transfer of the claim or any part thereof 12or interest therein has been made, except as stated in the 13petition; that the claimant is justly entitled to the amount 14therein claimed from the State of Illinois, after allowing all 15just credits; and that claimant believes the facts stated in 16the petition to be true. The petition shall be verified, as to 17statements of facts, by the affidavit of the claimant, his 18agent, or attorney. 19    (b) Whenever a person has served a term of imprisonment 20and has received a pardon by the Governor stating that such 21pardon was issued on the ground of innocence of the crime for 22which he or she was imprisoned, the Prisoner Review Board 23shall transmit this information to the clerk of the Court of 24Claims, together with the claimant's current address. Whenever 25a person has served a term of imprisonment and has received a   SB2843- 6 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1certificate of innocence from the Circuit Court as provided in 2Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the clerk of the 3issuing Circuit Court shall transmit this information to the 4clerk of the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's 5current address. The clerk of the Court of Claims shall 6immediately docket the case for consideration by the Court of 7Claims, and shall provide notice to the claimant of such 8docketing together with all hearing dates and applicable 9deadlines. The Court of Claims shall hear the case and render a 10decision within 90 days after its docketing. 11(Source: P.A. 95-970, eff. 9-22-08; 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.) 12    (705 ILCS 505/16)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.16)13    Sec. 16. Concurrence of judges. Except as provided in 14Section 10, concurrence Concurrence of 4 judges is necessary 15to the decision of any case; provided, however, the court in 16its discretion may assign any case to a commissioner for 17hearing and final decision, subject to whatever right of 18review the court by rule may choose to exercise. In matters 19involving the award of emergency funds under the Crime Victims 20Compensation Act, the decision of one judge is necessary to 21award emergency funds.22(Source: P.A. 92-286, eff. 1-1-02.) 23    (705 ILCS 505/19)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.19)24    Sec. 19. The Attorney General, or his assistants under his   SB2843- 7 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1direction, shall appear for the defense and protection of the 2interests of the State of Illinois in all cases filed in the 3court, and may make claim for recoupment by the State. Except 4as provided in Section 8.2, for all claims arising under 5subsection (b) of Section 8 of this Act:6        (1) the State agency must confirm or reject in writing 7    the allegations in the claim with the Attorney General's 8    office within 90 days of being contacted by the Attorney 9    General; and10        (2) the Attorney General must notify the claimant of 11    the State agency's decision and file a stipulation or 12    motion with the Court within 90 days of the State agency 13    confirming or rejecting the claim. 14(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 15    (705 ILCS 505/21)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.21)16    Sec. 21. The court is authorized to impose, by uniform 17rules, a fee of $15 for the filing of a petition in any case in 18which the award sought is more than $500 $50 and less than 19$10,000 $1,000 and $35 in any case in which the award sought is 20$10,000 $1,000 or more; and to charge and collect for copies of 21opinions or other documents filed in the Court of Claims such 22fees as may be prescribed by the rules of the Court. All fees 23and charges so collected shall be forthwith paid into the 24State Treasury. For claims that arise under subsection (b) of 25Section 8 of this Act, when the clerk issues an order in favor   SB2843- 8 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1of the vendor or the court rules in favor of the vendor, the 2filing fee shall be refunded to the vendor. The Court may 3determine the form and manner of all filing fees and other 4charges due the court by administrative rule. 5    A petitioner who is a prisoner in an Illinois Department 6of Corrections facility who files a pleading, motion, or other 7filing that purports to be a legal document against the State, 8the Illinois Department of Corrections, the Prisoner Review 9Board, or any of their officers or employees in which the court 10makes a specific finding that it is frivolous shall pay all 11filing fees and court costs in the manner provided in Article 12XXII of the Code of Civil Procedure.13    In claims based upon lapsed appropriations or lost warrant 14or in claims filed under the Line of Duty Compensation Act, the 15Illinois National Guardsman's Compensation Act, or the Crime 16Victims Compensation Act or in claims filed by medical vendors 17for medical services rendered by the claimant to persons 18eligible for Medical Assistance under programs administered by 19the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, no filing 20fee shall be required.21(Source: P.A. 104-188, eff. 1-1-26.) 22    (705 ILCS 505/24)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.24)23    Sec. 24. Payment of awards. 24    (1) From funds appropriated by the General Assembly for 25the purposes of this Section the Court may direct immediate   SB2843- 9 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1payment of:2        (a) All claims arising solely as a result of the 3    lapsing of an appropriation out of which the obligation 4    could have been paid.5        (b) All claims pursuant to the Line of Duty 6    Compensation Act.7        (c) All claims pursuant to the "Illinois National 8    Guardsman's and Naval Militiaman's Compensation Act", 9    approved August 12, 1971, as amended.10        (d) All claims pursuant to the "Crime Victims 11    Compensation Act", approved August 23, 1973, as amended.12        (d-5) All claims against the State for unjust 13    imprisonment as provided in subsection (c) of Section 8 of 14    this Act. 15        (e) All other claims wherein the amount of the award 16    of the Court is less than $50,000.17    (2) The court may, from funds specifically appropriated 18from the General Revenue Fund for this purpose, direct the 19payment of awards less than $100,000 $50,000 solely as a 20result of the lapsing of an appropriation originally made from 21any fund held by the State Treasurer. For any such award paid 22from the General Revenue Fund, the court shall thereafter seek 23an appropriation from the fund from which the liability 24originally accrued in reimbursement of the General Revenue 25Fund.26    (3) In directing payment of a claim pursuant to the Line of   SB2843- 10 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1Duty Compensation Act, the Court must direct the Comptroller 2to add an interest penalty if payment of a claim is not made 3within 6 months after a claim is filed in accordance with 4Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation Act and all 5information has been submitted as required under Section 4 of 6the Line of Duty Compensation Act. If payment is not issued 7within the 6-month period, an interest penalty of 1% of the 8amount of the award shall be added for each month or fraction 9thereof after the end of the 6-month period, until final 10payment is made. This interest penalty shall be added 11regardless of whether the payment is not issued within the 126-month period because of the appropriation process, the 13consideration of the matter by the Court, or any other reason. 14    (3.5) The interest penalty payment provided for in 15subsection (3) shall be added to all claims for which benefits 16were not paid as of the effective date of P.A. 95-928. The 17interest penalty shall be calculated starting from the 18effective date of P.A. 95-928, provided that the effective 19date of P.A. 95-928 is at least 6 months after the date on 20which the claim was filed in accordance with Section 3 of the 21Line of Duty Compensation Act. In the event that the date 6 22months after the date on which the claim was filed is later 23than the effective date of P.A. 95-928, the Court shall 24calculate the interest payment penalty starting from the date 256 months after the date on which the claim was filed in 26accordance with Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation   SB2843- 11 -LRB104 17175 JRC 30594 b1Act. This subsection (3.5) of this amendatory Act of the 96th 2General Assembly is declarative of existing law. 3    (3.6) In addition to the interest payments provided for in 4subsections (3) and (3.5), the Court shall direct the 5Comptroller to add a "catch-up" payment to the claims of 6eligible claimants. For the purposes of this subsection (3.6), 7an "eligible claimant" is a claimant whose claim is not paid in 8the year in which it was filed. For purposes of this subsection 9(3.6), "'catch-up' payment" is defined as the difference 10between the amount paid to claimants whose claims were filed 11in the year in which the eligible claimant's claim is paid and 12the amount paid to claimants whose claims were filed in the 13year in which the eligible claimant filed his or her claim. The 14"catch-up" payment is payable simultaneously with the claim 15award. 16    (4) From funds appropriated by the General Assembly for 17the purposes of paying claims under paragraph (c) of Section 188, the court must direct payment of each claim and the payment 19must be received by the claimant within 60 days after the date 20that the funds are appropriated for that purpose. 21(Source: P.A. 100-1124, eff. 11-27-18.)